Utah statutes.
61-2c-203 (Superseded 01/01/10).   Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  To qualify for licensure under this chapter, an individual:
(a)  shall have good moral character and the competency to transact the
business of residential mortgage loans;
(b)  shall demonstrate honesty, integrity, and truthfulness;
(c)  except as provided in Subsection (3), may not have been convicted in the
ten years preceding the day on which an application is submitted to the
division of:
(i)  any felony or class A misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; or
(ii)  any crime in any other jurisdiction that is the equivalent of a felony
or class A misdemeanor involving moral turpitude;
(d)  except as provided in Subsection (3), may not have been convicted in the
five years preceding the day on which an application is submitted to the
division of:
(i)  any class B or class C misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; or
(ii)  any crime in another jurisdiction that is the equivalent of a class B or
class C misdemeanor involving moral turpitude;
(e)  except as provided in Subsection (3), in relationship to a crime set
forth in Subsection (1)(c) or (d) during the time period set forth in
Subsection (1)(c) or (d), may not have:
(i)  entered a guilty plea, a no contest plea, or its equivalent; and
(ii)  resolved by diversion or its equivalent;
(f)  except as provided in Subsection 61-2c-202(4)(e), may not have had a
license or registration suspended, revoked, surrendered, canceled, or denied
in the five years preceding the date the individual applies for licensure
except as provided in Subsection (3), if:
(i)  the registration or license is issued by this state or another
jurisdiction; and
(ii)  the suspension, revocation, surrender, probation, fine, cancellation, or
denial is based on misconduct in a professional capacity that relates to moral
character, honesty, integrity, truthfulness, or the competency to transact the
business of residential mortgage loans;
(g)  except as provided in Subsection (3), may not have been the subject of a
bar by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the New York Stock Exchange, or
the National Association of Securities Dealers within the five years preceding
the date the individual applies for registration; and
(h)  may not have had any temporary or permanent injunction entered against
the individual:
(i)  by a court or licensing agency; and
(ii) on the basis of:
(A)  conduct or a practice involving the business of residential mortgage
loans; or
(B)  conduct involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.
(2)  To qualify for licensure under this chapter an entity may not have:
(a)  any of the following individuals in management who fails to meet the
requirements of Subsection (1):
(i)  a manager or a managing partner;
(ii)  a director;
(iii)  an executive officer; or
(iv)  an individual occupying a position or performing functions similar to
those described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) through (iii); or
(b)  a principal lending manager who fails to meet the requirements of
Subsection (1).
(3)  Notwithstanding the failure to meet the requirements of Subsections
(1)(c) through (h), the division may permit an individual or entity to be
licensed under this chapter if the individual applicant or a person listed in
Subsection (2):
(a)  fails to meet the requirements of Subsections (1)(c) through (h);
(b)  otherwise meets the qualifications for licensure; and
(c)  provides evidence satisfactory to the division with the concurrence of
the commission that the individual applicant or person described in Subsection
(2):
(i)  is of good moral character;
(ii)  is honest;
(iii)  has integrity;
(iv)  is truthful; and
(v)  has the competency to transact the business of residential mortgage
loans.
